Missouri, session 2026, HB1813.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 324.009, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 324.009, to read as follows:
324.009. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or military
occupational [speciality] specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or
profession in a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States including the Air Force, Army,
Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard and any other military
branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the United States, and
all reserve components and auxiliaries. Such term also includes the military reserves and
militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Missouri law enforcement officer", any person employed by or otherwise serving
in a position for the state or a local governmental entity in the state of Missouri as a police
officer, peace officer certified under chapter 590, auxiliary police officer, sheriff, sheriff's
deputy, member of the patrol as that term is defined in section 43.010, or in some like position
involving the enforcement of the law and protection of the public interest at the risk of that
person's life and who is a permanent resident of the state of Missouri or who is domiciled in
the state of Missouri;
(4) "Nonresident military or law enforcement spouse":
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1813 2
(a) A nonresident spouse of an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United
States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to the state of Missouri, or
who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be
domiciled in the state of Missouri, or has moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent
change-of-station basis; or
(b) A nonresident spouse of a person residing outside the state of Missouri who has
accepted an offer of employment from and with the state or a local governmental entity in the
state of Missouri and who will become a Missouri law enforcement officer upon the
commencement of such employment;
(5) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction that
issues licenses;
(6) "Resident military or law enforcement spouse", a spouse of an active duty
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to
be transferred to the state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of
the state of Missouri, who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or
her home of record, or a spouse of a Missouri law enforcement officer.
2. Any person who holds a valid current license issued by another state, a branch or
unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia, and who has
been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction, may submit an application for a
license in Missouri in the same occupation or profession, and at the same practice level, for
which he or she holds the current license, along with proof of current licensure and proof of
licensure for at least one year in the other jurisdiction, to the relevant oversight body in this
state.
3. The oversight body in this state shall:
(1) Within six months of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of this
section, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this
state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum education requirements and, if
applicable, work experience and clinical supervision requirements in effect and the other
[state] jurisdiction verifies that the person met those requirements in order to be licensed or
certified in that [state] jurisdiction. An oversight body that administers an examination on
laws of this state as part of its licensing application requirement may require an applicant to
take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state; or
(2) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subsection 2 of this
section from a nonresident military or law enforcement spouse or a resident military or law
enforcement spouse, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for
licensure in this state for the applicant and issue such applicant a license under this section if
such applicant otherwise meets the requirements of this section.

HB 1813 3
4. (1) The oversight body shall not waive any examination, educational, or
experience requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an
oversight body outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint
pending, or who is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, with an oversight body outside the state; who does not hold a license in
good standing with an oversight body outside the state; who has a criminal record that would
disqualify him or her for licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold a valid current license in
the other jurisdiction on the date the oversight body receives his or her application under this
section.
(2) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
oversight body shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter
resolved. If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the oversight body may
deny a license until the matter is resolved.
(3) The Missouri board for architects, professional engineers, professional land
surveyors and professional landscape architects may deny a license or decline to grant a
temporary or probationary license to an applicant if the board determines the
applicant's qualifications are not substantially equivalent to those established by the
board. The board shall not otherwise be exempt from the provisions of this section.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the oversight body from denying a license to
an applicant under this section for any reason described in any section associated with the
occupation or profession for which the applicant seeks a license.
6. Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this section shall be subject to
the applicable oversight body's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the
practice of the licensed occupation or profession in this state.
7. This section shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant to
pay any fees, post any bonds or surety bonds, or submit proof of insurance associated with the
license the applicant seeks.
8. This section shall not apply to business, professional, or occupational licenses
issued or required by political subdivisions.
9. The provisions of this section shall not impede an oversight body's authority to
require an applicant to submit fingerprints as part of the application process.
10. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter the authority granted
by, or any requirements promulgated pursuant to, any interjurisdictional or interstate
compacts adopted by Missouri statute or any reciprocity agreements with other states in
effect, and whenever possible this section shall be interpreted so as to imply no conflict
between it and any compact, or any reciprocity agreements with other states in effect.

HB 1813 4
11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a license issued under this section
shall be valid only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to be part of an interstate
compact. An applicant who is licensed in another state pursuant to an interstate compact shall
not be eligible for licensure by an oversight body under the provisions of this section.
12. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any occupation set forth in
subsection 6 of section 290.257, or any electrical contractor licensed under sections 324.900
to 324.945.
✔